si_animate_case2.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
    +N      ! Noun
    +Sg     ! Singular
    +Pl     ! Plural
    +Poss   ! Possessive

LEXICON Root
    Nouns ;

LEXICON Nouns
    දරුවා    N ;
    මිතුරා   N ;
    ගුරුතුමා N ;
    

LEXICON N
    +N:^    Num ;

LEXICON Num
    +Sg:0      PossWithS ;
    +Pl:න්     PossWithoutS ;   ! Plural: just add න්

LEXICON PossWithS
    +Poss:ගේ   # ;
               # ;

LEXICON PossWithoutS
    +Poss:ගේ   # ;
               # ;

END
